Washington statutes.
RCW 43.12.041

Official bonds.

The commissioner and those appointed by the commissioner shall enter into good and sufficient surety company bonds as required by law, in the following sums: Commissioner, fifty thousand dollars; and other appointees in such sum as may be fixed in the manner provided by law.

[ 2003 c 334 s 307; 1927 c 255 s 16; RRS s 7797-16. Prior: 1907 c 119 ss 1, 2; RRS ss 7816, 7817. Formerly RCW 79.01.064, 43.12.040.]

NOTES:

Intent—2003 c 334: See note following RCW 79.02.010.